District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

29A-935

Annual report of association; contents; penalty for false statement — Notice of delinquent reports; failure to file; mandamus.

Repealed.

History

June 19, 1940, 54 Stat. 488, ch. 397, § 35
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(q), 58 DCR 1720

Prior Codifications

2001 Ed., § 29-935.
1981 Ed., § 29-1135.
1973 Ed., § 29-835.